Washington statutes.
RCW 33.36.060

Suppressing, secreting, or destroying evidence or records.

Any person who, for the purpose of concealing any material fact, suppresses any evidence or abstract, removes, mutilates, destroys, or secretes any book, paper or record of an association, or of the director, or of anyone connected with the association or the office of the director, is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1994 c 92 s 453; 1982 c 3 s 65; 1945 c 235 s 91; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-210. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 106; 1919 c 169 s 19.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.